Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.692

[Art. 93] Cruelty and maltreatment.

Any person subject to this code who is guilty of cruelty toward, or oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to his or her orders shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 781; 1963 c 220 s 92.]